test/src/morphology/noere_stoere_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Adj - noere: # adj. on -e
    noere+A+Attr: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Nom: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Gen: noeren
    noere+A+Sg+Acc: noerem
    noere+A+Sg+Ill: noerese
    noere+A+Sg+Ine: noeresne
    noere+A+Sg+Ela: noereste
    noere+A+Sg+Com: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Nom: [noereh, noerh]
    noere+A+Pl+Gen: noeri
    noere+A+Pl+Acc: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ill: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ine: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Ela: noerijste
    noere+A+Pl+Com: noerigujmie
    noere+A+Ess: noerine
    noere+A+Comp+Attr: [nuerebe
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: nuerebe
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: nuereben
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: nuerebem
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: nueriebasse
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: nueriebisnie
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: nueriebistie
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Com: nueriebinie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: nuerebh
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: nueriebidie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [nuerebi, nuerebij]
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: nueriebidie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: nueriebinie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: nueriebijstie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Com: nuerebigujmie
    noere+A+Comp+Ess: nueriebinie
    noere+A+Superl+Attr: nööremes
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: nööremes
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: nööremassen
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: nööremassem
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: nööremassese
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: nööremassesne
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: nööremasseste
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Com: nööremassine
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: nööremesh
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: nööremasside
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: [nööremessi, nööremessij]
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: nööremasside
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: nööremassine
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: nööremassijste
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Com: nööremassigujmie
    noere+A+Superl+Ess: nööremassine
    
  Adj - noere: # adj. on -e  # Sørlig- Røros, sjekk opp disse, er ikke sikre
    noere+A+Attr: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Nom: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Gen: noeren
    noere+A+Sg+Acc: noerem
    noere+A+Sg+Ill: noerese
    noere+A+Sg+Ine: noeresne
    noere+A+Sg+Ela: noereste
    noere+A+Sg+Com: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Nom: [noereh, noerh]
    noere+A+Pl+Gen: noeri
    noere+A+Pl+Acc: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ill: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ine: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Ela: noerijste
    noere+A+Pl+Com: noerigujmie
    noere+A+Ess: noerine
    noere+A+Comp+Attr: noerebe
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: noerebe
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: noereben
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: noerebem
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: noerebasse
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: noerebisnie
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: noerebistie
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Com: noerebinie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: noerebh
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: noerebidie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [noerebi, noerebij]
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: noerebidie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: noerebinie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: noerebijstie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Com: noerebigujmie
    noere+A+Comp+Ess: noerebinie
    
    
    noere+A+Superl+Attr: noeremes
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: noeremes # nööremos, noeremos
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: noeremassen # nööremossen, noeremossen
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: noeremassem #nööremossem, noeremossem
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: noeremassese # nööremossese, noeremossese
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: noeremassesne # nööremossesne, noeremossesne
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: noeremasseste # nööremosseste, noeremosseste
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Com: noeremassine # nööremossine, noeremossine
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: noeremesh # nööremosh, noeremosh
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: noeremasside # nööremosside, noeremosside
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: noeremassi # nööremossi, noeremossi
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: noeremasside # nööremosside, noeremosside
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: noeremossine # nööremossine,noeremossine
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: noeremassijste # nööremossijste, noeremossijste
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Com: noeremassigujmie # nööremossigujmie, noeremossigujmie
    noere+A+Superl+Ess:  noeremassine # nööremossine, noeremossine 



  Adj - stoere: # adj. on -e # både nordlig + sørlig
    stoere+A+Attr: [stoerre, stoere]
    stoere+A+Sg+Nom: [stoerre, stoere]
    stoere+A+Sg+Gen: [stoerren, stoeren]
    stoere+A+Sg+Acc: [stoerrem, stoerem]
    stoere+A+Sg+Ill: [stoerrese, stoerese]
    stoere+A+Sg+Ine: [stoerresne, stoeresne]
    stoere+A+Sg+Ela: [stoerreste, stoereste]
    stoere+A+Sg+Com: [stoerrine, stoerine]
    stoere+A+Pl+Nom: [stoereh, stoerreh, stoerh, stoerrh]
    stoere+A+Pl+Gen: [stoerri, stoeri]
    stoere+A+Pl+Acc: [stoerride, stoeride]
    stoere+A+Pl+Ill: [stoerride, stoeride]
    stoere+A+Pl+Ine: [stoerrine, stoerine]
    stoere+A+Pl+Ela: [stoerrijste, stoerijste]
    stoere+A+Pl+Com: [stoerrigujmie, stoerigujmie]
    stoere+A+Ess: stoerrine, stoerine
    stoere+A+Comp+Attr: [stuerebe, stoerebe]
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [stuerebem, stoerebem]
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: [stuereben, stoereben]
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: [stuerebem, stoerebem]
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: [stueriebasse, stoerebasse]
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: [stueriebisnie, stoerebisnie]
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: [stueriebistie, stoerebistie]
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [stueriebinie, stoerebinie]
    stoere+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [stuerebh, stoerebh]
    stoere+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [stueriebidie, stoerebidie]
    stoere+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [stuerebi, stoerebi]
    stoere+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: [stueriebidie, stoerebidie]
    stoere+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: [stueriebinie, stoerebinie]
    stoere+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: [stueriebijstie, stoerebijstie]
    stoere+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [stuerebigujmie, stoerebigujmie]
    stoere+A+Comp+Ess: [stueriebinie, stoerebinie]
    stoere+A+Superl+Attr: [stööremes, stoeremes]
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [stööremes, stoeremes]
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: [stööremassen, stoeremassen] # stoeremossen
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: [stööremassem, stoeremassem] # stoeremossen
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: [stööremassese, stoeremassese] # stoeremossese
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: [stööremassesne, stoeremassesne] # stoeremossesne
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [stööremasseste, stoeremasseste] # stoeremosseste
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Com: [stööremassine, stoeremasseste] # stoeremosseste
    stoere+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: [stööremesh, stoeremesh]
    stoere+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: [stööremasside, stoeremasside]  # stoeremosside
    stoere+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: [stööremassi, stoeremassi] # stoeremossi
    stoere+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: [stööremasside, stoeremasside] # stoeremosside
    stoere+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: [stööremassine, stoeremassine] # stoeremossine
    stoere+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [stööremassijste, stoeremassijste]  #  stoeremossijste
    stoere+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [stööremassigujmie, stoeremassigujmie] #  stoeremossigujmie
    stoere+A+Superl+Ess: [stööremassine, stoeremassine] # stoeremossine
